Washington statutes.
RCW 26.52.005

Findings—Intent.

The problem of women fleeing across state lines to escape their abusers is epidemic in the United States. In 1994, Congress enacted the violence against women act (VAWA) as Title IV of the violent crime control and law enforcement act (P.L. 103-322). The VAWA provides for improved prevention and prosecution of violent crimes against women and children. Section 2265 of the VAWA (Title IV, P.L. 103-322) provides for nationwide enforcement of civil and criminal protection orders in state and tribal courts throughout the country.

The legislature finds that existing statutes may not provide an adequate mechanism for victims, police, prosecutors, and courts to enforce a foreign protection order in our state. It is the intent of the legislature that the barriers faced by persons entitled to protection under a foreign protection order will be removed and that violations of foreign protection orders be criminally prosecuted in this state.

[ 1999 c 184 s 2.]